Washington statutes.
RCW 18.100.065

Authority of directors, officers to render same services as corporation.

Except as otherwise provided in RCW 18.100.118, all directors of a corporation organized under this chapter and all officers other than the secretary and the treasurer shall be duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the same specific professional services within this or any other state as those for which the corporation was incorporated.

[ 1998 c 293 s 2; 1983 c 51 s 7.]